Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.405

Annuities and retirement income plans—Contributions by faculty and employees.

Members of the faculties and such other employees exempt from civil service pursuant to RCW 41.06.070 (1)(z) and (2) as are designated by the boards of regents of the state universities, the boards of trustees of the regional universities and of The Evergreen State College, the student achievement council, or the state board for community and technical colleges who do not opt to become members of the teachers' retirement system or the public employees' retirement system under RCW 41.32.836 or 41.40.798, or who are not prevented from participation in an annuity or retirement plan under RCW 28B.10.400(2) shall be required to contribute not less than five percent of their salaries during each year of full-time service after the first two years of such service toward the purchase of such annuity or retirement income plan; such contributions may be in addition to federal social security tax contributions, if any.

[ 2012 c 229 s 513; 2011 1st sp.s. c 47 s 3; 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 16; 1973 1st ex.s. c 149 s 2; 1971 ex.s. c 261 s 2; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.10.405. Prior: 1955 c 123 s 2; 1947 c 223 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4543-12. Formerly RCW 28.76.250.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.

Intent—Effective dates—2011 1st sp.s. c 47: See notes following RCW 28B.10.400.

Severability—Nomenclature—Savings—1977 ex.s. c 169: See notes following RCW 28B.10.016.

Severability—Appropriation—Effective date—1973 1st ex.s. c 149: See notes following RCW 28B.10.400.

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 261: See note following RCW 28B.10.400.